Idaho, session 2025, S1033.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 22-4505, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-4505. NUISANCE ACTIONS. (1) An agricultural operation, agricul-
tural facility or expansion thereof shall not be found to be a nuisance under
the circumstances described in section 22-4503, Idaho Code.
(2) An agricultural operation, agricultural facility or expansion
thereof that is operated in accordance with generally recognized agricul-
tural practices or in compliance with a state or federally issued permit
shall not be found to be a public or private nuisance. The provisions of
this subsection shall not apply when a nuisance results from the improper or
negligent operation of an agricultural operation, agricultural facility or
expansion thereof.
(3) If a public or private nuisance claim or cause of action is filed
against the owner or operator of an agricultural operation or the owner of
the land on which the agricultural operation is conducted and the applica-
ble court finds that the owner or operator is the prevailing party in the
action because the agricultural operation was conducted in accordance with
this chapter, then the owner or operator shall be entitled to receive its
reasonable attorney's fees and costs from the non-prevailing party.
(4)(a) Any person who files or makes more than one (1) meritless com-
plaint with the Idaho department of agriculture, the Idaho department
of environmental quality, the Idaho department of lands, or any other
state or local law enforcement agency against a specific agricultural
operation within a two (2) year period from the date of the first com-
plaint shall be subject to the following penalties:
(i) Filing or making a second meritless complaint within two (2)
years shall be an infraction and subject to a one hundred fifty
dollar ($150) fine.
(ii) Filing or making a third meritless complaint within two (2)
years shall be an infraction and subject to a three hundred dollar
($300) fine.
(iii) Filing or making a fourth or subsequent meritless complaint
within two (2) years shall be a misdemeanor.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "meritless complaint" means
a complaint made or filed with the Idaho department of agriculture,
the Idaho department of environmental quality, the Idaho department of
lands, or any other state or local law enforcement agency alleging that


an agricultural operation constitutes a public or private nuisance as
described in this chapter when that agricultural operation was operat-
ing in compliance with this chapter at the time of the complaint.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.